Colorado, session 2026A, SB037.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-3-101, add (18) as
follows:
13-3-101. State court administrator - duties - report - definitions
- repeal.
(18) (a) THE STATE COURT ADMINISTRATOR SHALL DEVELOP A
PROCESS FOR EVALUATING BOND HEARING OFFICERS APPOINTED PURSUANT
TO SECTION 16-4-116. THE ANNUAL EVALUATIONS MUST INCLUDE THE
OPPORTUNITY FOR INPUT FROM ATTORNEYS, COURT STAFF, AND OTHER
INTERESTED COURT USERS.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) IN EACH ANNUAL EVALUATION, INPUT MUST BE GIVEN BY:
(I) THE ELECTED DISTRICT ATTORNEY, OR THE DISTRICT ATTORNEY'S
DESIGNEE, FOR EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT IN WHICH THE BOND HEARING
OFFICER PRESIDED DURING THE EVALUATION PERIOD; AND
(II) THE REGIONAL PUBLIC DEFENDER, OR THE PUBLIC DEFENDER'S
DESIGNEE, FOR EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT IN WHICH THE BOND HEARING
OFFICER PRESIDED DURING THE EVALUATION PERIOD.
(c) THE EVALUATION PROCESS MUST ENSURE THAT INPUT IS
SOLICITED FROM EACH JUDICIAL DISTRICT IN WHICH A WEEKEND BOND
HEARING OFFICER PRESIDES, RECOGNIZING THAT PRACTICES, RESOURCES,
AND CONDITIONS MAY VARY SIGNIFICANTLY ACROSS JUDICIAL DISTRICTS.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-037

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-037